Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.150

Planning agency—Joint meetings.

Two or more county planning agencies in any combination may hold joint meetings and by approval of their respective boards may have the same chair.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4111; 1963 c 4 s 36.70.150. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 15.]